Hawaii statutes.
[§39A-348] Special purpose revenue bond
anticipation notes. Whenever the department has authorized the issuance of
special purpose revenue bonds under this part, special purpose revenue bond
anticipation notes of the department may be issued in anticipation of the
issuance of the bonds and of the receipt of the proceeds of sale of the bonds,
for the purposes for which the bonds have been authorized. All special purpose
revenue bond anticipation notes shall be authorized by the department, and the
maximum principal amount of the notes shall not exceed the authorized principal
amount of the bonds. The notes shall be payable solely from and secured solely
by the proceeds of sale of the special purpose revenue bonds in anticipation of
which the notes are issued and the revenues from which would be payable and by
which the bonds would be secured; provided that to the extent that the
principal of the notes shall be paid from moneys other than the proceeds of
sale of the bonds, the maximum amount of bonds in anticipation of which the
notes are issued that has been authorized shall be reduced by the amount of
notes paid in such manner. The authorization, issuance, and the details of the
notes shall be governed by this part with respect to special purpose revenue
bonds insofar as the same may be applicable; provided that each note, together
with all renewals and extensions thereof, or refundings thereof by other notes
issued under this section, shall mature within five years from the date of the
original note. [L 2012, c 147, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next